Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-1428
Franchise; discovery; inspection; rules of civil procedure.

The rules of civil procedure relating to discovery and inspection shall apply to hearings held under the Motor Vehicle Industry Regulation Act, and the board may issue orders to give effect to such rules.

If issues are raised which would involve violations of any state or federal antitrust or price-fixing law, all discovery and inspection proceedings which would be available under such issues in a state or federal court action shall be available to the parties to the hearing, and the board may issue orders to give effect to such proceedings.

Evidence which would be admissible under the issues in a state or federal court action shall be admissible in a hearing held by the board or hearing officer employed by the board. The board shall apportion all costs between the parties.

Laws 1971, LB 768, § 28;

Laws 2010, LB816, § 76;

Laws 2022, LB1148, § 6.